Utah statutes.
17-24-4.   Payment of warrants, checks, or other instruments.

(1)  When a warrant is presented for payment and there is money in the treasury, the treasurer shall pay it.

(2)  Upon receiving the notice from the county auditor under Subsection 17-19-3(3)(b) and if there is adequate money in the treasury, the treasurer shall, by check or other payment mechanism, make any payment not already paid by warrant.

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1) and (2), the treasurer has no obligation to pay any warrant or to issue any check or other payment instrument before receiving the certified list under Subsection 17-20-1.7(4).

